Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Apportionment and Distribution of Taxes

§ 51-7-71.
Contracts between districts as to apportionment and distribution of taxes collected in counties lying in two or more districts.

The governing bodies of the several water management districts and waterway districts heretofore or hereafter organized under authority of law in the State of Mississippi are authorized and empowered to negotiate and contract with each other in the apportionment and distribution of tax proceeds accruing from ad valorem taxes authorized the several districts under authority of law, from a county which lies within two or more such water management or waterway districts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-211; Laws, 1964, ch. 248, eff from and after passage (approved April 30, 1964).